Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202279-1136
Sections, how construed.

Sections 79-1131 to 79-1136 do not prevent funding from sources other than the public schools for the program for children with disabilities who are less than five years of age.

Laws 1978, LB 889, § 10;

R.S.1943, (1984), § 43-646.09;

Laws 1987, LB 367, § 29;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-3329;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 818;

Laws 1997, LB 346, § 26;

Laws 2019, LB675, § 29.